Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 2

Custom Hatching or Producing for Sale

44-16-201. License required.

Every person engaging in the business of custom hatching, producing baby chicks for sale or selling or offering baby chicks for sale either individually or by or through community sale, public pavilions or public auction shall obtain a license from the department for each establishment at which such business is conducted.

Acts 1945, ch. 176, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.16 (Williams, § 525.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1805.

44-16-202. [Repealed.]

Acts 1945, ch. 176, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.17 (Williams, § 525.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1806; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 23, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Note. Former §44-16-202 concerned license fee; expiration date; application for license.

44-16-203. Duties of licensees.

Any person coming under this part shall:

Maintain sanitary measures such as will properly suppress and prevent the spread of contagious and infectious diseases of baby chicks;

Provide ample facilities for the proper care and handling of baby chicks on the premises;

Determine that all baby chicks are in a healthy condition before offering them for sale; and

Label all containers holding baby chicks, when offered for sale as a unit, with the following: number of baby chicks; breed and variety of baby chicks; date hatched; whether or not parent stock has been tested for pullorum disease; cockerels, pullets, or straight run; name and address of producer; and the name and address of the seller.

Acts 1945, ch. 176, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.18 (Williams, § 525.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1807.

44-16-204. Access to premises — Enforcement by commissioner.

The commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's duly authorized agent has free access at all reasonable hours to any place of business coming under this part.

The commissioner shall enforce this part and has the authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of its provisions.

Acts 1945, ch. 176, §§ 5, 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.19 (Williams, §§ 525.5, 525.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1808.

44-16-205. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Baby chicks” means all domestic fowl six (6) weeks of age or under;

“Department” means department of agriculture; and

“Person” includes every person, partnership, firm, company, association, society, public auction, community sale, sale pavilion, syndicate, and corporation.

Acts 1945, ch. 176, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.15 (Williams, § 525.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1809.

44-16-206. Application of law.

This part shall not be construed to include any person who hatches for sale one thousand (1,000) or fewer baby chicks per year.

Acts 1945, ch. 176, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.19 (Williams, § 525.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1810.

44-16-207. Violation a misdemeanor — Revocation of license.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor, but if the violation occurs after a conviction has become final, the person's license shall be revoked.

Acts 1945, ch. 176, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 547.20 (Williams, § 525.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1811; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.